Connecticut, session 2026, HB05158.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No institution of higher
education in the state may reduce the amount of financial aid awarded
to any student as a result of such student receiving a scholarship,
whether from a private or public source, provided an institution of
higher education may reduce the amount of financial aid (1) if a
student's total financial aid meets or exceeds such student's cost of
attendance, as defined in 20 USC 1087ll, as amended from time to time,
(2) if such reduction is necessary to bring the total financial aid awarded
to a student athlete, as defined in section 10a-56 of the general statutes,
in compliance with the individual or team financial aid restrictions of an
athletic association or conference, including, but not limited to, the
NCAA, as defined in section 10a-55k of the general statutes, or (3) as a
result of such student receiving a grant under the Roberta B. Willis
Scholarship program, established pursuant to section 10a-173 of the
general statutes. As used in this section, "financial aid" means the sum
of all scholarships, grants and federal, state and institutional aid
received by a student, and "financial aid" does not include any federal,
state or private student loans received by a student.
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5158
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2